Maryland, session 2025, SB0114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 2.5–103 through 2.5–108 of Article – Business Regulation of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 2.5–104 through 2.5–109, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
2.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 250 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) “License” means any grant of authority to an individual to practice an
occupation or profession.
(2) “License” includes a certificate, permit, or registration.
(e) “Unit” means a unit in the Department that is authorized to issue a license.
(f) “Veteran” means a former service member who was discharged from active
duty under circumstances other than dishonorable before the date on which the application
for a license is submitted.
2.5–103.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A UNIT THAT ESTABLISHES A PROCESS
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) EACH UNIT MAY ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO INCLUDE A NOTATION
INDICATING VETERAN STATUS ON A LICENSE AND TO ASSIST IN DETERMINING
ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE AND FEDERAL VETERANS’ BENEFITS.
(C) (1) AN APPLICATION FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE OR RENEWAL LICENSE
ISSUED BY A UNIT SHALL ALLOW THE APPLICANT TO:
(I) REQUEST THAT A NOTATION OF THE APPLICANT’S VETERAN
STATUS BE INCLUDED ON THE LICENSE; AND
(II) PROVIDE AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT TO BEING CONTACTED BY
APPROPRIATE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCIES REGARDING THE APPLICANT’S
ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR FEDERAL VETERANS’ BENEFITS.
(2) AN APPLICANT FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE OR A RENEWAL LICENSE
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE UNIT ONE OF THE FOLLOWING AS CERTIFICATION OF
VETERAN STATUS:
(I) A CERTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED FROM
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(II) A FEDERAL CERTIFICATE OF RELEASE OR DISCHARGE
FROM ACTIVE DUTY (DD FORM 214); OR
(III) ANY OTHER DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE UNIT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 250
(D) IF AN APPLICANT FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE OR A RENEWAL LICENSE
SUBMITS THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, THE UNIT SHALL INCLUDE A NOTATION OF VETERAN STATUS ON THE
LICENSE.
(E) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 4–304 THROUGH 4–325 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON REQUEST BY AN
EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY, A UNIT SHALL ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ABOUT EACH
APPLICANT FOR AN INITIAL LICENSE OR A RENEWAL LICENSE WHO CONSENTS TO
BEING CONTACTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –